Utah statutes.
70A-2a-512.   Lessee's duties as to rightfully rejected goods.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided with respect to goods that threaten to
decline in value speedily as provided in Section 70A-2a-511 and subject to any
security interest of a lessee as provided in Subsection 70A-2a-508(5):
(a)  the lessee, after rejection of goods in the lessee's possession, shall
hold them with reasonable care at the lessor's or the supplier's disposition
for a reasonable time after the lessee's seasonable notification of rejection;
(b)  if the lessor or the supplier gives no instructions within a reasonable
time after notification of rejection, the lessee may store the rejected goods
for the lessor's or the supplier's account or ship them to the lessor or the
supplier or dispose of them for the lessor's or the supplier's account with
reimbursement in the manner provided in Section 70A-2a-511; but
(c)  the lessee has no further obligations with regard to goods rightfully
rejected.
(2)  Action by the lessee pursuant to Subsection (1) is not acceptance or
conversion.
